Florida, session 2026, HB421.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Judicial
Efficiency and Transparency (JET) Act."
Section 2. Section 28.51, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
28.51 Performance reports of circuit and county court
judges.—
(1) Each clerk of the circuit court shall prepare an
annual performance report regarding the judicial efficiency of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb421-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 421 2026
each circuit and county court judge in this state. The report
shall detail the judicial activities during the preceding
calendar year and contain, but need not be limited to, the
following information, all of which shall be separated by court
division:
(a) The number of cases assigned to each judge.
(b) The number of cases that have reached final
disposition. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "final
disposition" means the rendering of a decision or a judgment by
a judge in a judicial proceeding in which a case is finally
determined by adjudication, dismissal, or other final
disposition.
(c) The clearance rate, stated as the total percentage of
cases filed during each reporting period which were disposed of.
(d) The average length of all active pending cases,
measured as the number of days from filing until the end of each
reporting period.
(e) The number of civil cases assigned to each judge,
except civil cases placed on inactive status, pending for 3
years or more, measured from the filing of a complaint or other
filing initiating a case until the end of each reporting period.
(f) The average number of days, beginning on the date a
hearing is scheduled and ending on the date the hearing is held,
for each hearing held in each reporting period.
(2) On or before April 1 of each year, each report shall
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb421-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 421 2026
be posted on the website of the clerk of the circuit court, as
applicable, and on the website of each circuit and county court
and shall remain posted for the duration of the tenure of the
subject judge.
(3) A judge may prepare an explanatory statement detailing
the basis for any extenuating circumstance that the judge
believes impacts the metrics reported pursuant to this section.
Upon approval of the Chief Judge of each circuit, the
explanatory statement shall be posted with the annual
performance report pursuant to subsection (2).
(4) The first reporting period required by this section
shall be the 2028 calendar year.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb421-00